Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
Habitual Violator

186.641.
When abstract of driving record to be certified to county attorney.

On and after June 21, 1974, and when the records of the Transportation Cabinet disclose that any person has been convicted under the traffic laws of this state, or a valid municipal or county ordinance paralleling and substantially conforming to a like state law, of an offense occurring on or after June 21, 1974, which record of conviction, when taken with, and added to the previous convictions of such person of offenses occurring within five (5) years prior to the date of such offense, as contained in the files of the Transportation Cabinet, shall reveal that said person is an habitual violator, as hereinafter defined, the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet shall forthwith certify to the county attorney of the county in which such person resides according to the records of the cabinet, a full and complete abstract of the person’s driving record as shown in the files of the cabinet. The provisions of this section shall apply only to offenses and records of offenses committed after June 21, 1974. These provisions shall have no retroactive effect before June 21, 1974.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 374, § 1.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A driving under the influence (DUI) conviction entered prior to June 21, 1974 may be used to enhance the penalty for a subsequent DUI conviction pursuant to KRS 189.520(2) and KRS

189.990

(9)(a).

OAG 84-175

(opinion prior to 1984 amendment of KRS

189.990

).

186.642.
“Habitual violator” defined. [Repealed.]

186.643.
Information to be filed by county attorney. [Repealed.]

186.644.
Hearing. [Repealed.]

186.645.
Findings of court. [Repealed.]

186.646.
License not to be issued to habitual violator. [Repealed.]

186.647.
Restoration of license. [Repealed.]

186.648.
Appeal. [Repealed.]

186.649.
Law not to affect existing laws or ordinances of political subdivisions. [Repealed.]